Connecticut, session 2026, HB05036.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
2 (1) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Administrative
3 Services;
4 (2) "Municipality" means any town, city, borough, consolidated town
5 and city or consolidated town and borough;
6 (3) "Residential solar photovoltaic system" means equipment and
7 devices that (A) have the primary purpose of collecting solar energy and
8 generating electricity by photovoltaic effect, (B) have a nameplate
9 capacity rating of twelve kilowatts or less, and (C) are installed on the
10 roof of a single-family or multifamily home; and
11 (4) "Smart solar permitting platform" means an Internet-based
12 platform developed or implemented by the Commissioner of
13 Administrative Services to automate the review of an application for a
sHB5036 / File No. 373 1

sHB5036 File No. 373
14 building permit to construct a residential solar photovoltaic system.
15 (b) Not later than July 1, 2028, the Commissioner of Administrative
16 Services shall develop or implement the smart solar permitting platform
17 for the purpose of (1) automatically reviewing applications to construct
18 a residential solar photovoltaic system, and (2) instantly releasing a
19 building permit to construct such system if such system complies with
20 the Connecticut State Building Code. To satisfy the requirements of this
21 section, the commissioner may either develop the platform or
22 implement a platform developed by a third party, provided a platform
23 developed by a third party shall be provided to the commissioner at no
24 cost or low cost, as determined by the commissioner.
25 (c) The commissioner shall develop or implement and administer the
26 smart solar permitting platform to:
27 (1) Be available for use by the Department of Administrative Services,
28 any municipality, any architect licensed pursuant to chapter 390 of the
29 general statutes, any professional engineer licensed pursuant to chapter
30 391 of the general statutes and any contractor licensed pursuant to
31 chapter 393 of the general statutes;
32 (2) Perform an automated evaluation of any application to construct
33 a residential solar photovoltaic system to determine whether such
34 system complies with the requirements of the Connecticut State
35 Building Code and whether such application complies with the
36 regulations adopted by the commissioner pursuant to this section;
37 (3) Instantly release a building permit for any such application that is
38 determined to comply with the requirements of the Connecticut State
39 Building Code and the regulations adopted by the commissioner
40 pursuant to this section after such evaluation;
41 (4) Have the capacity to process a permit application for not less than
42 seventy-five per cent of residential rooftop solar photovoltaic systems
43 that (A) weigh less than four pounds or less per square foot, (B) provide
44 electrical power to detached single and multi-family homes, and (C)
sHB5036 / File No. 373 2

sHB5036 File No. 373
45 comply with Connecticut State Building Code requirements for
46 installation on an existing residential structure;
47 (5) Provide users of the platform with the ability to submit an
48 application to construct a residential solar photovoltaic system twenty-
49 four hours a day, except when the platform is unavailable because of a
50 system upgrade or maintenance;
51 (6) Allow the use of digital signatures, stamps, seals or certifications
52 on all submitted applications and supporting documents necessary for
53 the issuance of a permit;
54 (7) Provide customer service to assist users in navigating the
55 platform; and
56 (8) Be updated as necessary to conform with changes to the
57 Connecticut State Building Code or any other applicable state law.
58 (d) (1) A municipality shall either allow for the submission of
59 applications to construct a residential solar photovoltaic system through
60 the smart solar permitting platform or through an alternative automated
61 solar permitting platform that satisfies the requirements set forth in this
62 section in an equivalent manner as the smart solar permitting platform.
63 Any municipality that implements an alternative automated solar
64 permitting platform shall enable access to the alternative platform not
65 later than January 1, 2029. A municipality that implements an
66 alternative automated solar permitting platform shall not require an
67 applicant to submit any documentation or information that is not
68 required through the smart solar permitting platform.
69 (2) A municipality that allows for the submission of residential solar
70 photovoltaic system applications through the smart solar permitting
71 platform shall, not later than January 1, 2029, revise its permitting fee
72 schedule to reflect any reduction in cost or resources expended by the
73 municipality to permit residential solar energy systems.
74 (e) (1) A municipality that allows for the submission of applications
75 to construct a residential solar photovoltaic system through an
sHB5036 / File No. 373 3

sHB5036 File No. 373
76 alternative automated solar permitting platform shall submit a
77 compliance report to the commissioner, in a form and manner
78 prescribed by the commissioner, not later than sixty days after the
79 municipality implements such alternative platform. A local compliance
80 report shall include, but need not be limited to:
81 (A) The date of compliance by the municipality;
82 (B) The software used for compliance by the municipality; and
83 (C) Documentation demonstrating that the alternative automated
84 solar permitting platform implemented by the municipality satisfies the
85 requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this section in an equivalent
86 manner as the platform implemented by the commissioner.
87 (2) If the commissioner determines that documentation submitted in
88 a local compliance report pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection
89 is insufficient to verify that the alternative platform satisfies the
90 requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this section in an equivalent
91 manner as the platform implemented by the commissioner, the
92 municipality shall provide the commissioner, at the commissioner's
93 request, access to the municipality's alternative platform so that the
94 commissioner may determine whether the alternative platform
95 complies with said requirements.
96 (3) The commissioner shall provide public access to any local
97 compliance report submitted by a municipality on the Internet web site
98 of the Department of Administrative Services.
99 (f) (1) A municipality that implements an alternative automated solar
100 permitting platform pursuant to this section shall, commencing on July
101 1, 2029, submit an annual report to the commissioner. The commissioner
102 may establish guidelines for annual reports required under this
103 subsection. Each such annual report shall include, but need not be
104 limited to:
105 (A) The number of permits released by the municipality for
106 residential solar photovoltaic systems through the alternative
sHB5036 / File No. 373 4

sHB5036 File No. 373
107 automated solar permitting platform and the relevant characteristics of
108 such systems;
109 (B) The number of permits released by the municipality for
110 residential solar photovoltaic systems through means other than the
111 alternative automated solar permitting platform and the relevant
112 characteristics of such systems; and
113 (C) Documentation demonstrating that the alternative automated
114 solar permitting platform satisfies the requirements set forth in
115 subsection (c) of this section in an equivalent manner as the platform
116 implemented by the commissioner.
117 (2) If the commissioner determines that documentation submitted
118 pursuant to subdivision (1) of this subsection is insufficient to verify that
119 the alternative automated solar permitting platform meets the
120 requirements set forth in subsection (c) of this section in an equivalent
121 manner as the platform implemented by the commissioner, the
122 municipality shall provide the commissioner, at the commissioner's
123 request, access to the platform so that the commissioner may determine
124 whether the alternative platform complies with said requirements.
125 (3) The commissioner shall provide public access to annual reports
126 submitted by a municipality on the Internet web site of the Department
127 of Administrative Services.
128 (g) The commissioner shall prescribe the form and format of
129 applications for permits, including supporting documentation,
130 specifications, requirements for digital signatures, stamps, seals or
131 certifications and other information exchanged through the smart solar
132 permitting platform. The commissioner shall require that any
133 application and supporting documents submitted pursuant to this
134 section be prepared and submitted by any architect licensed pursuant
135 to chapter 390 of the general statutes, any professional engineer licensed
136 pursuant to chapter 391 of the general statutes or any contractor licensed
137 pursuant to chapter 393 of the general statutes. The commissioner shall
138 waive any requirement related to physical signatures, stamps, seals,
sHB5036 / File No. 373 5

sHB5036 File No. 373
139 certifications or notarization imposed by statute, regulation or local
140 ordinance in order for the smart solar permitting platform to process
141 permit applications, provided the permit application contains a digital
142 signature, stamp, seal or certification.
143 (h) A person exchanging information through either the smart solar
144 permitting platform or through an alternative automated solar
145 permitting platform shall not be subject to a licensing sanction, civil
146 penalty, fine, permit disapproval, revocation or other sanction for
147 failure to comply with any statute, regulation or local ordinance that
148 requires submission of such information in physical form, including, but
149 not limited to, any requirement that the information be (1) in a particular
150 form or of a particular size, (2) submitted with multiple copies, (3)
151 physically attached to another document, (4) an original document, or
152 (5) signed, stamped, sealed, certified or notarized.
153 (i) The commissioner, in consultation with the Public Utilities
154 Regulatory Authority and the Commissioner of Energy and
155 Environmental Protection, shall issue a request for proposal for the
156 development of the smart solar permitting platform consistent with the
157 requirements of subsection (c) of this section. In addition to any other
158 requirements that the commissioner may deem appropriate, the request
159 for proposal shall:
160 (1) Incorporate the standards developed pursuant to subsection (c) of
161 this section; and
162 (2) Require all bidders to demonstrate experience in the development
163 of one or more Internet-based automated permit-review platforms.
164 Sec. 2. Section 22a-1f of the general statutes is amended by adding
165 subsection (f) as follows (Effective July 1, 2026):
166 (NEW) (f) Environmental impact evaluations shall not be required for
167 the installation of an electric vehicle charging station, as defined in
168 section 16-19f, and charging infrastructure associated with any such
169 station, or for the installation or construction of a solar photovoltaic
sHB5036 / File No. 373 6

sHB5036 File No. 373
170 facility on developed land if the owner, lessor or operator of such
171 developed land receives state funding.
172 Sec. 3. (NEW) (Effective July 1, 2026) In connection with the
173 negotiation of a new or renewed lease agreement pursuant to chapter 59
174 of the general statutes, or at the time a capital infrastructure
175 improvement becomes feasible and important to agency operations, as
176 determined by the Commissioner of Administrative Services, the
177 commissioner may enter into a financing agreement with an owner or
178 lessor of real property, a public utility or a third-party financing
179 provider for the installation of infrastructure related to electric vehicle
180 charging, renewable energy generation or energy storage. In
181 determining whether to enter into any such financing agreement, the
182 commissioner shall consider the (1) expected life of such infrastructure
183 improvement, (2) length of the expected use of the site or the life of the
184 lease, (3) length of the state's needs for the infrastructure improvement,
185 (4) benefits provided to the property owner, and (5) operations and
186 maintenance requirements for equipment associated with the
187 infrastructure improvement.
188 Sec. 4. Section 16-245nn of the general statutes is repealed. (Effective
189 January 1, 2029)
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 2 July 1, 2026 22a-1f(f)
Sec. 3 July 1, 2026 New section
Sec. 4 January 1, 2029 Repealer section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 1(a)(3), subparagraph designators were added for clarity.
ET Joint Favorable Subst. -LCO
sHB5036 / File No. 373 7

sHB5036 File No. 373
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact:
Agency Affected Fund-Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Department of Administrative GF - Cost 14,700,000 1,700,000
Services
State Comptroller - Fringe GF - Cost 209,100 209,100
Benefits1
Note: GF=General Fund
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which requires the Department of Administrative Services
to develop or implement a state-wide solar permitting platform, results
in a General Fund cost of $14,909,100 in FY 27 and $1,909,100 annually
thereafter. The costs include 1) a one-time cost of $13 million to build
the platform, 2) $500,000 in salary and $209,100 in fringe to hire five new
employees, and 3) $1.2 million annually for training, licenses, and other
operating expenses including cloud computing services.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to inflation.
The bill results in a potential savings to municipalities in the out years
to the extent less resources are required to approve certain building
1The fringe benefit costs for most state employees are budgeted centrally in accounts
administered by the Comptroller. The estimated active employee fringe benefit cost
associated with most personnel changes is 41.82% of payroll in FY 27.
sHB5036 / File No. 373 8

sHB5036 File No. 373
applications and permits. The bill also results in a potential revenue loss
to municipalities associated with lower permit fees as the bill requires
municipalities to revise permitting fee schedules to reflect any savings
to the municipalities. It is expected that the overall net impact to
municipalities will be zero.
sHB5036 / File No. 373 9

sHB5036 File No. 373
OLR Bill Analysis
sHB 5036
AN ACT STREAMLINING RESIDENTIAL SOLAR PERMITTING AND
ENERGY INFRASTRUCTURE.